Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1165.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Private Myles Ness Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Myles Albert Ness was born December 4, 1892, in York, York County.(2) Private Ness joined the United States Army in 1917 where he served as a private in the 6th Infantry Regiment fighting in World War I in which he was wounded in action.(3) The 6th Infantry Regiment was part of the 5th Infantry Division during the war and fought in several campaigns but primarily fought in the Meuse-Argonne Offensive.(4) Private Ness died on May 15, 1958, and is buried at 123456789101112131415161718 the Zion United Methodist Church on Freysville Road in Windsor Township, York County.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 44210, carrying State Route 2001 over Kreutz Creek in Windsor Township, York County, is designated the Private Myles Ness Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1165PN1291 - 2 - 1234567891011